Utah statutes.
77-19-7.   Judgment of death -- Statement to Board of Pardons and Parole.

The judge of a court where a judgment of death was had shall, immediately after the conviction, transmit to the chair of the Board of Pardons and Parole a statement of the conviction and judgment and a summary of the evidence given at trial.

